Maine, session 132, LD561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3737, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Reimbursements for subsidies. The department shall reimburse a provider of child
care services provided under this chapter for subsidy payments under the Maine Child Care
Affordability Program in section 3731-A administered by the department pursuant to rules
adopted by the department. Reimbursement under the program to a child care provider must
be based on generally accepted payment practices for private-pay families for child care,
including enrollment-based rather than attendance-based practices, and may not be reduced
or eliminated based on a child's attendance. Reimbursement based on generally accepted
payment practices must support child care provider stability and encourage more child care
providers to serve children receiving child care services. In developing the program, the
department shall identify the practices common for child care providers serving private-
pay families and determine which practices are most important to meet the goals of
ensuring that high-quality child care providers will participate in the subsidy program and
make a plan to align requirements for providers accepting children receiving federal Child
Care and Development Fund child care assistance to the practices of private-paying child
care providers. The department shall examine generally accepted payment practices
regarding paying prospectively based on enrollment and practices related to separating
provider closure limits for holidays or vacations or to compensate for inclement weather
from child absence allowances. The department shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
For the purposes of this subsection, "generally accepted payment practices" are practices
that align with the private-paying child care market in order to encourage providers to
accept children receiving federal Child Care and Development Fund child care assistance
and enable families to retain child care services.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.